Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.395

University tract—Powers of regents, generally.

In addition to the powers conferred under the original deeds of conveyance to the state of Washington and under existing law, and subject to RCW 28B.20.382, the board of regents has full control of the university tract as provided in this chapter including, but not limited to:

(1) With regard to the whole or portions of the land, the authority to manage, to improve, to alter, to operate, to lease, to contract indebtedness, to borrow funds, to issue bonds, notes, and warrants, to provide for the amortization of and to pay the bonds, notes, warrants, and other evidences of indebtedness, at or prior to maturity, to use and pledge the income derived from operating, managing, and leasing the university tract for such purpose, and to otherwise own, operate, and control the university tract to the same extent as any other property of the university;

(2) With regard to the whole or portions of any building or buildings or other improvements thereon or appurtenances thereto, the authority to sell, subject to the terms of any underlying lease on the land, to manage, to improve, to alter, to operate, to lease, to grant a deed of trust or a mortgage lien, to contract indebtedness, to borrow funds, to issue bonds, notes, and warrants, to provide for the amortization thereof and to pay the bonds, notes, warrants, and other evidences of indebtedness, at or prior to maturity, to use and pledge the income derived from operating, managing, and leasing the university tract for such purpose, and to otherwise own, operate, and control the university tract to the same extent as any other property of the university consistent with the purpose of the donors of the metropolitan tract.

[ 1999 c 346 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—Effective date—1999 c 346: See notes following RCW 28B.20.381.